sk-SK: Rôzne druhy pochutín: Bhujia; Chivda; Zmes lotosových semienok (Foxnut); Namkeen; Orieškový mix; Párty mix; Proteínový mix; Pražený cícer (chana); Sev; Snack mix; Zmes orieškov a sušeného ovocia; Iné
vi: Nhiều loại đồ ăn nhẹ hỗn hợp: Bhujia; Chivda; Hạt súng hỗn hợp; Namkeen; Hạt hỗn hợp; Đồ ăn nhẹ hỗn hợp; Hỗn hợp protein; Đậu gà rang; Sev; Snack hỗn hợp; Hạt và trái cây sấy hỗn hợp; Khác
ko: 스낵 믹스 유형: 부지아; 치브다; 폭스너트 믹스; 남킨; 견과류 믹스; 파티 믹스; 단백질 믹스; 볶은 차나; 세브; 스낵 믹스; 트레일 믹스; 기타
fr: Variété de mélange pour collation: Bhujia; Chivda; Mélange de noix de renard; Namkeen; Mélange de noix; Mélange apéritif; Mélange protéiné; Chana grillé; Sev; Mélange de collations; Mélange du randonneur; Autre
el: Ποικιλία μειγμάτων σνακ: Μπούτζια; Τσίβντα; Μείγμα μακάνα (foxnut); Ναμκίν; Μείγμα ξηρών καρπών; Μείγμα για πάρτι; Μείγμα πρωτεΐνης; Ψητά ρεβίθια; Σεβ; Μείγμα σνακ; Μείγμα ξηρών καρπών και φρούτων; Άλλο
de: Art der Snackmischung: Bhujia; Chivda; Foxnut-Mix; Namkeen; Nussmix; Party-Mix; Protein-Mix; Geröstete Chana; Sev; Snack-Mix; Studentenfutter; Andere
nl: Snackmix variëteit: Bhujia; Chivda; Foxnut-mix; Namkeen; Notenmix; Partymix; Eiwitmix; Geroosterde chana; Sev; Snackmix; Studentenhaver; Anders
it: Varietà mix di snack: Bhujia; Chivda; Mix di semi di loto; Namkeen; Mix di frutta secca; Party mix; Mix proteico; Ceci tostati; Sev; Snack mix; Trail mix; Altro
th: ขนมขบเคี้ยวหลากหลายชนิด: บูเจีย; ชิฟดา; ฟอกซ์นัทรวม; นัมคีน; ถั่วรวม; ปาร์ตี้มิกซ์; โปรตีนมิกซ์; ถั่วลูกไก่อบ; เซฟ; สแน็กมิกซ์; เทรลมิกซ์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Sorta mešanice prigrizkov: Bhujia; Chivda; Mešanica foxnut; Namkeen; Mešanica oreščkov; Mešanica za zabave; Proteinska mešanica; Pražena čičerika (chana); Sev; Mešanica prigrizkov; Študentska hrana; Drugo
ru: Разновидность снековой смеси: Бхуджия; Чивда; Смесь с маханой; Намкин; Ореховая смесь; Праздничная смесь; Протеиновая смесь; Жареный нут; Сев; Снековая смесь; Смесь орехов и сухофруктов; Другое
fi: Välipalamixit: Bhujia; Chivda; Makhana-sekoitus; Namkeen; Pähkinäsekoitus; Juhlasekoitus; Proteiinisekoitus; Paahdettu kikherne; Sev; Napostelusekoitus; Evässekoitus; Muu
pl: Odmiana przekąski: Bhujia; Chivda; Mieszanka z orzechami makhana; Namkeen; Mieszanka orzechów; Mieszanka imprezowa; Mieszanka białkowa; Prażona ciecierzyca; Sev; Mieszanka przekąsek; Mieszanka studencka; Inne
en: Snack mix variety: Bhujia; Chivda; Foxnut mix; Namkeen; Nut mix; Party mix; Protein mix; Roasted chana; Sev; Snack mix; Trail mix; Other
es: Variedad de snacks: Bhujia; Chivda; Mezcla de nueces de zorro; Namkeen; Mezcla de frutos secos; Mezcla para fiestas; Mezcla de proteínas; Garbanzos tostados; Sev; Mezcla de snacks; Mezcla de frutos secos y semillas; Otro
nb: Snacksblanding-variant: Bhujia; Chivda; Foxnut-blanding; Namkeen; Nøtteblanding; Partymiks; Proteinblanding; Ristet chana; Sev; Snacksblanding; Tursnacks; Annet
ja: スナックミックス種類: ブジア; チヴダ; フォックスナッツミックス; ナムキーン; ナッツミックス; パーティーミックス; プロテインミックス; ローストチャナ; セブ; スナックミックス; トレイルミックス; その他
bg-BG: Разновидност на снакс микса: Буджия; Чивда; Микс от макхана (водна лилия); Намкийн; Ядков микс; Парти микс; Протеинов микс; Печен нахут; Сев; Микс от снаксове; Микс за из път; Друг
zh-CN: 混合零食种类: 印度香料脆条 (Bhujia); 印度香料麦片 (Chivda); 芡实混合零食; 印度咸味零食 (Namkeen); 混合坚果; 派对混合零食; 蛋白混合零食; 烤鹰嘴豆; 印度香料细面 (Sev); 混合零食; 混合果仁; 其他
lt-LT: Užkandžių mišinio rūšis: Bhujia; Chivda; Lotoso sėklų mišinys; Namkeen; Riešutų mišinys; Vakarėlių mišinys; Baltyminis mišinys; Skrudinti avinžirniai (chana); Sev; Užkandžių mišinys; Riešutų ir džiovintų vaisių mišinys; Kita
da: Variant af snackblanding: Bhujia; Chivda; Foxnut-blanding; Namkeen; Nøddeblanding; Party-blanding; Proteinblanding; Ristede kikærter; Sev; Snackblanding; Trail mix; Andet
tr: Atıştırmalık karışımı türü: Bhujia; Chivda; Lotus tohumu karışımı; Namkeen; Kuruyemiş karışımı; Parti karışımı; Protein karışımı; Kavrulmuş leblebi; Sev; Atıştırmalık karışımı; Çerez karışımı; Diğer
pt-PT: Variedade de misturas de snacks: Bhujia; Chivda; Mistura de noz-de-raposa; Namkeen; Mistura de frutos secos; Mistura para festas; Mistura de proteínas; Grão-de-bico torrado; Sev; Mistura de snacks; Mistura de frutos secos e sementes; Outra
zh-TW: 綜合零食種類: Bhujia; Chivda; 綜合芡實; Namkeen (印度鹹點); 綜合堅果; 派對綜合零食; 高蛋白綜合零食; 烤鷹嘴豆; Sev; 綜合零食; 綜合堅果果乾; 其他
pt-BR: Mix de snacks variedade: Bhujia; Chivda; Mix de nozes de lótus; Namkeen; Mix de castanhas; Mix para festas; Mix de proteínas; Grão-de-bico torrado; Sev; Mix de aperitivos; Mix de frutas secas e castanhas; Outra
sv: Snackmixvariant: Bhujia; Chivda; Foxnut-mix; Namkeen; Nötmix; Partymix; Proteinmix; Rostad chana; Sev; Snacksmix; Trailmix; Övrigt
hr-HR: Raznovrsne mješavine za grickalice: Bhujia; Chivda; Mješavina foxnut oraha; Namkeen; Mješavina orašastih plodova; Party mješavina; Proteinska mješavina; Prženi slanutak; Sev; Mješavina grickalica; Mješavina za planinarenje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Sortiment de amestec de gustări: Bhujia; Chivda; Mix de nuci foxnut; Namkeen; Mix de nuci; Mix de petrecere; Mix proteic; Năut prăjit; Sev; Mix de gustări; Trail mix; Alta
cs: Různé druhy svačinových směsí: Bhujia; Chivda; Směs makhana; Namkeen; Ořechová směs; Párty směs; Proteinová směs; Pražená cizrna; Sev; Svačinová směs; Studentská směs; Jiné
hu: Rágcsálnivaló-keverék fajtája: Bhujia; Chivda; Lótuszmag (foxnut) keverék; Namkeen; Magkeverék; Parti keverék; Fehérjekeverék; Pörkölt csicseriborsó; Sev; Snack keverék; Diákcsemege; Egyéb